Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.070

Execution in particular cases.

When any judgment of a court of this state requires the payment of money or the delivery of real or personal property, it may be enforced by execution. When a judgment of a court of record requires the performance of any other act, a certified copy of the judgment may be served on the party against whom it is given or the person or officer who is required by the judgment or by law to obey the same, and a writ may be issued commanding the person or officer to obey or enforce the judgment. Refusal to do so may be punished by the court as for contempt.

[ 1987 c 442 s 407; 1957 c 8 s 1; 1929 c 25 s 1; RRS s 512. Prior: Code 1881 s 326; 1877 p 68 s 330; 1854 p 176 s 244. Formerly RCW 6.04.030.]